Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2427
Designated broker; appointment of
limited agent; effect.

A designated broker entering into
a limited agency agreement with a client for the listing of property or for
the purpose of representing that person in the buying, selling, exchanging,
renting, or leasing of real estate may appoint in writing those affiliated
licensees who will be acting as limited agents of that client to the exclusion
of all other affiliated licensees. A designated broker shall not be considered
to be a dual agent solely because he or she makes an appointment under this
section, except that any licensee who personally represents both the seller
and buyer or both the landlord and tenant in a particular transaction shall
be a dual agent and shall be required to comply with the provisions of sections
76-2401 to 76-2430 governing dual agents.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 27;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 13.